Alaska statutes. Title 9. Code of Civil Procedure.
Article 4. Eminent Domain.

Cross references. —

For related court rule, see Civ. R. 72.

Sec. 09.55.240.
Uses for which authorized; rights-of-way.

Except as provided in (d) and (e) of this section, the right of eminent domain may be exercised for the following public uses:

all public uses authorized by the government of the United States;

public buildings and grounds for the use of the state and all other public uses authorized by the legislature of the state;

public buildings and grounds for the use of an organized or unorganized borough, city, town, village, school district, or other municipal division, whether incorporated or unincorporated; canals, aqueducts, flumes, ditches, or pipes conducting water, heat, or gas for the use of the inhabitants of an organized or unorganized borough, city, town, or other municipal division, whether incorporated or unincorporated; raising the banks of streams, removing obstructions from them, and widening, deepening, or straightening their channels; and roads, streets, and alleys, and all other public uses for the benefit of an organized or unorganized borough, city, town, or other municipal division whether incorporated or unincorporated, or its inhabitants, which may be authorized by the legislature;

wharves, docks, piers, chutes, booms, ferries, bridges of all kinds, private roads, plant and turnpike roads, railroads, canals, ditches, flumes, aqueducts, and pipes for public transportation, supplying mines and farming neighborhoods with water, and draining and reclaiming land, and for floating logs and lumber on streams not navigable, and sites for reservoirs necessary for collecting and storing water;

roads, tunnels, ditches, flumes, pipes, and dumping places for working mines; also outlets, natural or otherwise, for the flow, deposit, or conduct of tailings or refuse matter from mines; also an occupancy in common by the owners or possessors of different mines of any place for the flow, deposit, or conduct of tailings or refuse matter from their several mines, and sites for reservoirs necessary for collecting and storing water;

private roads leading from highways to residences, mines, or farms;

telephone lines;

fiber-optic lines;

sewerage of an organized or unorganized borough, city, town, village, or other municipal division, whether incorporated or unincorporated, or a subdivision of it, or of a settlement consisting of not less than 10 families, or of public buildings belonging to the state or to a college or university;

tramway lines;

electric power lines;

for the location of pipelines for gathering, transmitting, transporting, storing, or delivering natural or artificial gas or oil or any liquid or gaseous hydrocarbons, including pumping stations, terminals, storage tanks, or reservoirs, and related installations.

The use of water for mining, power, and municipal purposes and the use of pole and power lines for telephone and telegraph wires, for aerial trams, and for the transmission of electric light and electric power, by whomever utilized, are each declared to be beneficial to the public and to be a public use within the provisions of AS

09.55.240

—

09.55.460

. Rights-of-way across private property when they are necessary for the operation of the mine or other project in connection with which it is intended to be used may be condemned in the manner as for any other condemnation. The right-of-way may extend only to a right-of-way along, on, and across the surface of the land to be condemned and to a strip of the land of sufficient width to permit the construction on the land of a ditch, flume, pipeline, canal, or other means of conveying water as is adequate for the purposes intended, for the setting of poles or the construction of towers on which to string wires for telephone lines and lines for the transmission of electric light or power for the operation of aerial trams, and to permit maintaining the lines and keeping them in repair.

[Repealed, § 15 ch 59 SLA 1982.]

The power of eminent domain may not be exercised to acquire private property from a private person for the purpose of transferring title to the property to another private person for economic development purposes. This subsection does not apply to transfers of private property to another private person if one or more of the following apply:

the landowner consents, either before or after a condemnation proceeding has been filed, to the use of the property for a private commercial enterprise or other economic development;

the private person has been expressly authorized by statute either to exercise the power of eminent domain or to receive an interest in land acquired by the exercise of eminent domain;

the transferred property is used for a private way of necessity to permit essential access for extraction or use of resources;

the acquisition is used, in part, for leasing property to a private person that occupies a portion of public property or a public facility, including a private business that occupies a portion of an airport, port, or public building;

the property is transferred to a person by oil and gas lease under AS

38.05.180

;

the property is transferred to a common carrier.

The power of eminent domain may not be exercised for the purpose of developing a recreational facility or project if the property to be acquired includes an individual landowner’s personal residence or recreational structure or that portion of an individual’s property attached to and within 250 linear feet of an individual landowner’s personal residence or recreational structure unless the landowner consents either before or after a condemnation proceeding has been filed.

Notwithstanding the limitations on the power of eminent domain in (d) and (e) of this section, the legislature may approve the exercise of eminent domain against private property in an Act, the subject of which is limited to the transfer of the property for a purpose otherwise restricted under (d) or (e) of this section.

The power of eminent domain may only be delegated by statute.

In this section,

“common carrier” has the meaning given in AS

04.16.125

;

“economic development” means development of property for a commercial enterprise carried on for profit or to increase tax revenue, tax base, or employment;

“personal residence” means a structure that is the dwelling place of an individual that

must be used by the owner or beneficiary of a trust holding legal title to the structure as a dwelling unit, as opposed to a rental, storage, or other commercial space;

must be inhabited by the owner, prior owner, or beneficiary of a trust holding legal title to the structure for at least 90 days during the 12-month period immediately before the date an action for the exercise of the power of eminent domain is filed;

must constitute an ordinary home for general living purposes; and

may not have been constructed, placed, or occupied for the purpose of avoiding eminent domain proceedings;

“private person” means a person that is not a public corporation as defined in AS

45.77.020

or a government as defined in AS

11.81.900

;

“recreational facility or project”

means a facility or project, the primary purpose of which is recreational;

includes a park, trail or pedestrian pathway, greenbelt, amusement park, fresh water boat harbor, sports facility, playground, infrastructure, or other facility related to or in support of an indoor or outdoor recreational facility or project;

does not include

a highway, sidewalk, or path within the right-of-way of a highway;

(ii)

a path, trail, or lane used as a safe route to a school program;

(iii)

a wayside or rest stop;

(iv)

a development, the primary purpose of which is not recreational, such as a path, trail, or lane developed to reduce congestion, or to encourage use of an alternate, gas-saving mode of transportation;

(v)

a path or trail to or between villages or from a village to a facility or resource;

(vi)

a stormwater retention or treatment facility or wetland, habitat, or other acquisition required to obtain a permit for a highway, airport, or other public project;

(vii)

a taking under AS

19.05.110

,

19.05.120

, AS

19.22.020

, AS

27.21.300

, AS

35.20.040

,

35.20.050

, or AS

41.35.060

;

(viii)

a taking not prohibited by law before January 1, 2007, under AS 41.21; and

(ix)

a path, trail, road, or site for which no reasonable alternative exists and which is necessary to preserve or establish public access to or along publicly owned land or water, if the use of the path, trail, road, or site itself is for transportation to or to facilitate use of publicly owned land or water;

(6)

“recreational structure” means a permanent structure that

(A)

is used by the owner or beneficiary of a trust holding legal title to the structure as a dwelling for seasonal recreational purposes, as opposed to a rental, storage, or other commercial space; and

(B)

may not have been constructed, placed, or occupied for the purpose of avoiding eminent domain proceedings.

History.

(§ 13.01 ch 101 SLA 1962; am § 2 ch 72 SLA 1972; am § 24 ch 3 FSSLA 1973; am § 1 ch 62 SLA 1973; am § 15 ch 59 SLA 1982; am §§ 2, 3 ch 84 SLA 2006; am §§ 1 — 3 ch 51 SLA 2009; am § 5 ch 22 SLA 2015; am §§
35, 103 ch 13 SLA 2019)

Revisor's notes. —

In 2019, the paragraphs in (a) were renumbered to reflect the repeal of former paragraph (9).

Cross references. —

For statement of legislative intent and findings for the 2006 amendment of (a) of this section and addition of (d) — (h) of this section, see § 1, ch. 84, SLA 2006, in the 2006 Temporary and Special Acts.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2015 amendment, effective May 15, 2015, deleted “, but not limited to,” in (a)(13).

The 2019 amendment, effective October 17, 2019, repealed former (a)(9); in (b), in the last sentence, deleted “and telegraph” following “wires for telephone” and made stylistic changes.

Editor's notes. —

Under § 6, ch. 84, SLA 2006, the 2006 amendment of (a) of this section and addition of (d) — (h) of this section apply “only to condemnation actions filed on or after October 3, 2006.”

Opinions of attorney general. —

The state may use its condemnation powers for a state office complex to be constructed by, and leased from, a private developer. In order to insure that the leasing arrangement clearly qualifies as a public use, however, the department should enter into a long-term lease with the developer, and should not grant the developer any sort of purchase option at the conclusion of the lease term. April 17, 1981, Op. Att’y Gen.

Sec. 09.55.250.
Classification of estates and land subject to be taken.

The following is a classification of the estates and rights in land subject to be taken for public use:

a fee simple, when taken for public buildings or grounds, or for permanent buildings, for reservoirs and dams and permanent flooding occasioned by them, or for an outlet for a flow, or a place for the deposit of debris or tailings of a mine, or when, in the judgment of the Department of Natural Resources, or the Department of Transportation and Public Facilities, a fee simple is necessary for any of the purposes for which the department, on behalf of the state, is authorized by law to acquire real property by condemnation;

an easement when taken for any other use;

the right of entry upon an occupation of land, and the right to take from the land earth, gravel, stones, trees, and timber as may be necessary for a public use.

History.

(§ 13.02 ch 101 SLA 1962; am § 10 ch 49 SLA 1963; am § 8 ch 130 SLA 1971)

Sec. 09.55.260.
Private property subject to be taken.

The private property that may be taken under AS

09.55.240

—

09.55.460

includes

all real property belonging to any person;

land belonging to the state or to an organized or unorganized borough, city, town, village, or other municipal division, whether incorporated or unincorporated, not appropriated to a public use;

property appropriated to public use, but the property may not be taken unless for a more necessary purpose than that to which it has already been appropriated;

franchises for a public utility, but those franchises may not be taken unless for a more necessary public use;

all rights-of-way for any of the purposes mentioned in AS

09.55.240

, and the structures and improvements on the rights-of-way, and the land held and used in connection with them shall be subject to be connected with, crossed, or intersected by another right-of-way or improvements or structures on them; they shall also be subject to a limited use, in common with the owner, when necessary; but the uses, crossings, intersections, and connections shall be made in the manner most compatible with the greatest public benefit and least private injury;

all classes of private property not enumerated may be taken for public use when the taking is authorized by law.

History.

(§ 13.03 ch 101 SLA 1962)

Sec. 09.55.265.
Taking of property under reservation void.

After April 14, 1966, no agency of the state may take privately-owned property by the election or exercise of a reservation to the state acquired under the Act of June 30, 1932, ch. 320, § 5, as added July 24, 1947, ch. 313, 61 Stat. 418, and taking of property after April 14, 1966 by the election or exercise of a reservation to the state under that federal Act is void.

History.

(§ 2 ch 92 SLA 1966)

Cross references. —

For legislative intent, see § 1, ch 92, SLA 1966, in the Temporary and Special Acts.

Editor’s notes. —

Act of June 30, 1932, ch. 320, § 5, formerly codified as 48 U.S.C. 321d, was repealed by P.L. 86-70, § 21(d)(7).

Sec. 09.55.266.
Existing rights not affected.

AS

09.55.265

may not be construed to divest the state of, or to require compensation by the state for, any right-of-way or other interest in real property that was taken by the state, before April 14, 1966, by the election or exercise of its right to take property through a reservation acquired under the Act of June 30, 1932, ch. 320, § 5, as added July 24, 1947, ch. 313, 61 Stat. 418.

History.

(§ 3 ch 92 SLA 1966)

Editor’s notes. —

Act of June 30, 1932, ch. 320, § 5, formerly codified as 48 U.S.C. § 321d, was repealed by P.L.86-70, § 21(d)(7).

Sec. 09.55.270.
Prerequisites.

Before property can be taken, it shall appear that

the use to which it is to be applied is a use authorized by law;

the taking is necessary to the use;

if already appropriated to a public use, the public use to which it is to be applied is a more necessary public use.

History.

(§ 13.04 ch 101 SLA 1962)

Cross references. —

For contents of complaint, see Civ.
R. 72(c).

Sec. 09.55.275.
Replat approval.

An agency of the state or municipality acquiring property in fee that results in a boundary change located within a municipality exercising the powers conferred by AS

29.35.180

or

29.35.260(c)

shall conform to this section by obtaining preliminary approval of a replat showing clearly the location of the proposed public street or other acquisition of property. The platting authority may establish applicable review procedures and standards for a replat made for the purpose of a right-of-way acquisition or condemnation. Neither the adequacy of the municipal replat process or standards, if any, nor the failure of a municipality to follow its own replat process and standards shall deprive the state of the authority to exercise its power of eminent domain. Final approval of replat shall also be obtained. However, if a state agency clearly demonstrates an overriding state interest, a waiver of the municipal approval requirements in this section may be granted by the governor.

History.

(§ 2 ch 96 SLA 1975; am § 23 ch 74 SLA 1985; am § 2 ch 32 SLA 2004)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1994, in the first sentence of this section, “An agency of the state or municipality may not” was substituted for “No agency of the state or municipality may” to conform the section to the current style of the Alaska statutes.

Cross references. —

For statement of legislative purpose and intent concerning the 2004 repeal and reenactment of this section, see § 1, ch. 32, SLA 2004, in the 2004 Temporary and Special Acts.

Sec. 09.55.280.
Entry upon land.

In all cases where land is required for public use, the state, the public entity, or persons having the authority to condemn, or its agents in charge of the use may enter upon the land and make examination, surveys, and maps and locate the boundaries; but it shall be located in the manner that will be most compatible with the greatest public good and the least private injury, and subject to the provisions of AS

09.55.300

.
The entry shall constitute no cause of action in favor of the owners of the land except for injuries resulting from negligence, wantonness, or malice.

History.

(§ 13.05 ch 101 SLA 1962)

Sec. 09.55.290.
Jurisdiction.

Eminent domain proceedings may be commenced in the superior court.

History.

(§ 13.06 ch 101 SLA 1962)

Cross references. —

For procedures generally, see Civ.
R. 72.

Sec. 09.55.300.
Powers of court.

The court has power

to regulate and determine the place and manner of making the connections and crossings or of enjoying the common uses mentioned in AS

09.55.260

(5), and of the occupying of canyons, passes, and defiles for railroad purposes, as permitted and regulated by law;

to limit the amount of property sought to be condemned if, in its opinion, the quantity sought to be condemned is not necessary.

If the court determines that the property is to be taken for a public use, and if all parties to the action do not object, the court shall appoint a master to determine the amount to be paid by the plaintiffs to each owner or other person interested in the property as compensation and damages by reason of the appropriation of the property. If all parties to the action object to the appointment of a master the court shall proceed with a jury trial, unless the jury is waived by all parties to the action.

History.

(§ 13.07 ch 101 SLA 1962; am § 1 ch 138 SLA 1968)

Cross references. —

For appointment of masters, see Civ.
R. 53; for hearing before master, see Civ.
R. 72(h)(2).

Sec. 09.55.310.
Hearing.

The jury or master shall hear the allegations and evidence of persons interested and shall ascertain and assess the following:

the value of the property sought to be condemned, and all improvements on it pertaining to the realty, and of each separate estate or interest in it; if it consists of different parcels, the value of each parcel and each estate or interest in each parcel shall be separately assessed;

if the property sought to be condemned constitutes only a part of a larger parcel, the damages that will accrue to the portion not sought to be condemned by reason of its severance from the portion sought to be condemned, and the construction of the improvements in the manner proposed by the plaintiff;

separately, how much the portion not sought to be condemned and each estate or interest in it will be benefited, if at all, by the construction of the improvements proposed by the plaintiff; and, if the benefit is equal to the damages assessed under (2) of this section, the owner of the parcel shall be allowed no damages except the value of the portion taken; but if the benefits are less than the damages so assessed, the former shall be deducted from the latter and the remainder shall be the only damages allowed in addition to the value;

if the property sought to be condemned is for a railroad, the cost of good and sufficient fences along the line of the railroad, and the cost of cattle guards where fences may cross the line of the railroad.

As far as practicable, compensation shall be assessed for each source of damages separately.

History.

(§ 13.08 ch 101 SLA 1962; am § 2 ch 138 SLA 1968)

Cross references. —

For related court rules, see Civ.
R. 72(e)(4) and (h).

Sec. 09.55.320.
Right to jury trial as to damages and value of property.

An interested party may appeal the master’s award of damages and valuation of the property, in which case there shall be a trial by jury on the question of the amount of damages and the value of the property, unless the jury is waived by the consent of all parties to the appeal.

History.

(§ 13.09 ch 101 SLA 1962)

Cross references. —

For related court rules, see Civ.
R. 72(h)(4) and (5).

Sec. 09.55.330.
Compensation and damages.

For the purpose of assessing compensation and damages, the right to them accrues at the date of issuance of the summons, and its actual value at that date is the measure of compensation of the property to be actually taken, and the basis of damages to property not actually taken but injuriously affected in the cases where the damages are allowed.
If an order is made letting the plaintiff into possession, as provided in AS

09.55.380

, the compensation and damages awarded shall draw lawful interest from the date of the order. Improvements put upon the property after the date of the service of summons may not be included in the assessment of compensation or damages.

History.

(§ 13.10 ch 101 SLA 1962)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1994, in the last sentence of this section, “Improvements put upon the property after the date of the service of summons may not be” was substituted for “No improvements put upon the property after the date of the service of summons shall be” to conform the section to the current style of the Alaska Statutes.

Cross references. —

For constitutional provision prohibiting the taking or damaging of private property for public use without just compensation, see Alaska Const., art. I, § 18.

Sec. 09.55.340.
Defective title.

If the title attempted to be acquired is found to be defective from any cause, the plaintiff may again institute proceedings to acquire the same as provided in AS

09.55.240

—

09.55.460

.

History.

(§ 13.11 ch 101 SLA 1962)

Sec. 09.55.350.
Time for paying compensation or damages and bond to build railroad fences and cattle guards.

The plaintiff shall, within 30 days after final judgment, pay the sum of money assessed.
If the use is for railroad purposes, the plaintiff may, at the time of or before the payment, elect to build the fences and cattle guards.
If the plaintiff so elects, the plaintiff shall execute to the defendant a bond, with one or more sureties to be approved by the court, in double the assessed cost of the same to build such fences and cattle guards within eight months from the time the railroad is built on the land taken.
If the bond is given, the plaintiff need not pay the cost of the fences and cattle guards.
In an action on the bond, the plaintiff may recover reasonable attorney fees.

History.

(§ 13.12 ch 101 SLA 1962)

Sec. 09.55.360.
Payment or deposit and execution.

Payment may be made to the defendants entitled to payment, or the money may be deposited in court for the defendants and be distributed to those entitled to it.
If the money is not so paid or deposited, the defendants may have execution as in civil cases. If the money cannot be obtained on execution, the court, upon a showing to that effect, shall set aside and annul the entire proceedings and restore possession of the property to the defendants if possession has been taken by the plaintiff.

History.

(§ 13.13 ch 101 SLA 1962)

Cross references. —

For related court rule, see Civ.
R. 72(j).

Sec. 09.55.370.
Final order of condemnation.

When payments have been made and the bond given, if the plaintiff elects to give one as required by AS

09.55.350

, the court shall make a final order of condemnation, which shall describe the property condemned and the purposes of the condemnation.
A copy of the order shall be recorded in the office of the recording district where the land is located, at which time the property described in the order vests in the plaintiff for the purposes specified in the order.

History.

(§ 13.14 ch 101 SLA 1962)

Revisor’s notes. —

Minor word changes related to the recording of documents were made in this section in 1988 under sec. 42, ch. 161, SLA 1988.

Sec. 09.55.380.
Order authorizing plaintiff to continue in or take possession.

Upon application of the plaintiff at any time after the jury’s verdict has been returned or the master’s report has been filed in the court, the court may make an order that, upon payment into court of the amount of damages assessed in the report or by the jury, the plaintiff, if already in possession of the property sought to be condemned, may continue in possession and, if not in possession, the court may authorize the plaintiff to take possession of the property and use and possess it until the final conclusion of the proceedings, and that all actions and proceedings against the plaintiff on that account be stayed until that time.
However, where an appeal is taken by the defendant, the court may also require the plaintiff to give a bond or undertaking with sufficient sureties before continuing or taking possession.
The bond or undertaking shall be approved by the court and shall be in the sum the court may direct, and conditioned to pay defendant any additional damages and costs given by the judgment over and above the amount assessed, and the damages which defendant sustains if the property is not taken for public uses.
For the purposes of this section the amount assessed as damages in the report or by the jury is considered as just compensation for the property appropriated until reassessed or changed in further proceedings. However, the plaintiff, by payment into court of the amount assessed or by giving security as above provided, is not precluded from an appeal, but may appeal in the manner and with the effect as if no money had been deposited or security given. If the plaintiff deposits the amount of the assessment and continues in possession or takes possession of the property and there is no dispute as to the ownership of the property, the defendant may at any time demand and receive from the court the money deposited, and the demand or receipt does not bar or preclude the defendant from the right of appeal. However, if the amount of the assessment is reduced on appeal by either party, the defendant who has received the amount of the assessment deposited is liable to the plaintiff for the difference between the amount received by the defendant and the amount finally assessed with legal interest from the time the defendant received the money deposited, and it may be recovered by action.

History.

(§ 13.15 ch 101 SLA 1962; am § 3 ch 138 SLA 1968)

Sec. 09.55.390.
Acquisition of easements and additional powers of the court to require surrender of possession to plaintiff.

The right to take possession under this section is in addition to any other right to take possession provided in AS

09.55.240

—

09.55.460

.
In proceedings for the acquisition of easements for the transmission and distribution of electric energy, communications, water, steam, and gas, the court may, upon motion and after a hearing, fix the time during which and the terms upon which the parties in possession are required to surrender possession to the plaintiff.
If the court finds that urgent public necessity requires, it may grant the plaintiff possession at any time after the action has been commenced. Notice of the hearing shall be as provided in the Alaska Rules of Civil Procedure, except that, where service by publication is required, notice may be given at any time following the date of the last publication by registered mail addressed to the defendant and to parties in possession at their last known addresses as shown on the latest tax roll of the political subdivision in which the premises are located or as indicated by other evidence that shall be satisfactory to the court.

History.

(§ 13.16 ch 101 SLA 1962)

Sec. 09.55.400.
Deposit into court of estimated compensation and damages; costs and fees.

The order given under AS

09.55.390

requiring the parties in possession to surrender possession to the plaintiff shall require that the plaintiff deposit with the clerk of the court an amount of money determined by the court fairly to represent the estimated compensation and the estimated damages to the defendant and for the speedy occupation, including reasonable relocation costs if required.
In addition the court shall include in its order a further requirement that the plaintiff execute and file with the clerk of the court a bond, approved as to form and as to sufficiency of the sureties by the court, in an amount equal to the amount of money required to be deposited, conditioned upon payment to the defendant of additional damages and costs found to be due to the defendant in the action. Costs or attorney fees may not be assessed against the defendant in an action brought under AS

09.55.390

.

History.

(§ 13.17 ch 101 SLA 1962)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1994, in the last sentence of this section, “Costs or attorney fees may not” was substituted for “No costs or attorney fees shall” to conform the section to the current style of the Alaska Statutes.

Cross references. —

For related court rule, see Civ.
R. 72(j).

Collateral references. —

Payment or deposit of award in court as affecting condemnor’s right to appeal, 40 ALR3d 203.

Sec. 09.55.410.
Withdrawal of funds by party in interest.

The money deposited in the court or a part of it may be withdrawn by a party in interest in the manner provided in AS

09.55.440

, and the court shall have the power to direct the payment of delinquent taxes and special assessments out of the amount determined to be just compensation and to make orders with respect to encumbrances, liens, rents, insurance, and other charges as are just and equitable.

History.

(§ 13.18 ch 101 SLA 1962)

Sec. 09.55.420.
Declaration of taking by state or municipality.

Where a proceeding is instituted under AS

09.55.240

—

09.55.460

by the state, it may file a declaration of taking with the complaint or at any time after the filing of the complaint, but before judgment. Where a proceeding is instituted under AS

09.55.240

—

09.55.460

by a municipality in the exercise of eminent domain for street or highway, off-street automobile parking facilities, school, sewer, water, telephone, electric, other utility, and slum clearance purposes or use granted to cities of the first class, the governing body of the municipality may exercise the power through the filing of a declaration of taking with the complaint or at any time after the filing of the complaint, but before judgment. The declaration of taking procedure may not be used with relation to the property of rural electrification or telephone cooperatives or nonprofit associations receiving financial assistance from the federal government under the Rural Electrification Act; provided that no declaration of taking for off-street parking purposes may be used unless there has been public notice by publication in a newspaper of general circulation in the area for not less than once a week for four consecutive weeks followed by a full and complete public hearing held before the governing body of the first class city or municipality.

[Repealed, § 15 ch 59 SLA 1982.]

History.

(§ 13.19 ch 101 SLA 1962; am § 2 ch 122 SLA 1966; am § 2 ch 62 SLA 1973; am § 15 ch 59 SLA 1982)

Cross references. —

For the Rural Electrification Act referred to in subsection (a), see 7 U.S.C. 901 et seq.

Legislative history reports. —

For report on ch. 122, SLA 1966 (HB 418 am 5), see 1966 House Journal, p. 432.

Opinions of attorney general. —

AS

09.55.420

—

09.55.440

were taken almost word for word from 40 USC 258a (now 40 USCS § 3114), except for substitutions of “state, public utility district, or school district” for “United States.” 1960 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 15.

A determination to condemn by an agency acting under power to condemn delegated to it by the legislature would not become a problem requiring judicial action unless a lack of necessity for a public use could be shown, and if there is no fraud, bad faith, or abuse of discretion. 1960 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 15.

The question of the necessity of taking land for public use is primarily a “legislative” question rather than a “judicial” question. 1960 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 15.

Land acquired by eminent domain for the Anchorage state office complex could be transferred in a land exchange and used for a different purpose free from any special use restrictions. There was some risk, however, of a challenge by the former owners of the land, particularly those still litigating the issue of just compensation for the earlier taking. July 24, 1986, Op. Att’y Gen.

Sec. 09.55.430.
Contents of declaration of taking.

The declaration of taking must contain

a statement of the authority under which the property or an interest in it is taken;

a statement of the public use for which the property or an interest in it is taken;

a description of the property sufficient for the identification of it;

a statement of the estate or interest in the property;

a map or plat showing the location of the property;

a statement of the amount of money estimated by the plaintiff to be just compensation for the property or the interest in it;

a statement that the property is taken by necessity for a project located in a manner that is most compatible with the greatest public good and the least private injury.

History.

(§ 13.20 ch 101 SLA 1962; am § 1 ch 149 SLA 1976)

Cross references. —

For appearance on answer, see Civ. R. 72(e)(3).

Sec. 09.55.440.
Vesting of title and compensation.

Upon the filing of the declaration of taking and the deposit with the court of the amount of the estimated compensation stated in the declaration, title to the estate as specified in the declaration vests in the plaintiff, and that property is condemned and taken for the use of the plaintiff, and the right to just compensation for it vests in the persons entitled to it. The compensation shall be ascertained and awarded in the proceeding and established by judgment. The judgment must include interest at the rate of 10.5 percent a year on the amount finally awarded that exceeds the amount paid into court under the declaration of taking. The interest runs from the date title vests to the date of payment of the judgment.

Upon motion of a party in interest and notice to all parties, the court may order that the money deposited or a part of it be paid immediately to the person or persons entitled to it for or on account of the just compensation to be awarded in the proceedings. If the compensation finally awarded exceeds the amount of money deposited, the deposit shall be offset against the award. If the compensation finally awarded is less than the amount of money deposited, the court shall enter judgment in favor of the plaintiff and against the proper parties for the amount of the excess.

History.

(§ 13.21 ch 101 SLA 1962; am § 3 ch 21 SLA 1985; am § 21 ch 26 SLA 1997)

Cross references. —

For a statement of legislative intent relating to the provisions of ch. 26, SLA 1997, see § 1, ch. 26, SLA 1997 in the 1997 Temporary and Special Acts.
For severability of the provisions of ch. 26, SLA 1997, see § 56, ch. 26, SLA 1997 in the 1997 Temporary and Special Acts.

Editor’s notes. —

Section 55, ch. 26, SLA 1997 provides that the provisions of ch. 26, SLA 1997 apply “to all causes of action accruing on or after August 7, 1997.”

Opinions of attorney general. —

The Alaska declaration of taking statutes are as effective as the federal statutes in effecting the vesting of title in the condemnor of whatever interest in the land it seeks to condemn.
If the state undertakes to obtain title to real property in fee simple absolute by the filing of a declaration of taking that is the title which it obtains. 1960 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 15.

Land acquired by eminent domain for the Anchorage state office complex could be transferred in a land exchange and used for a different purpose free from any special use restrictions. There was some risk, however, of a challenge by the former owners of the land, particularly those still litigating the issue of just compensation for the earlier taking. July 24, 1986, Op. Att’y Gen.

Sec. 09.55.450.
Right of entry and possession.

Upon the filing of the declaration of taking and the deposit of the estimated compensation, the court may, upon motion, fix the time during which and the terms upon which the parties in possession are required to surrender possession to the petitioner. However, the right of entry may not be granted the plaintiff until after the running of the time for the defendant to file an objection to the declaration of taking or until after the hearing on any objection to the declaration of taking if the objection is made in the time allowed by law. Where the party in possession withdraws any part of the award and remains in possession, the court may fix a reasonable rental for the premises to be paid by that party to the plaintiff during such possession.

The court may direct the payment of delinquent taxes and special assessments out of the amount determined to be just compensation, and make orders with respect to encumbrances, liens, rents, insurance, and other charges as are just and equitable.

The right to take possession and title in advance of final judgment where a declaration of taking is filed is in addition to any other rights to take possession provided in AS

09.55.240

—

09.55.460

.

History.

(§ 13.22 ch 101 SLA 1962; am § 2 ch 149 SLA 1976)

Opinions of attorney general. —

Possession is deferred pursuant to this section for at least that period of time which is granted to the defendant to file a challenge to the declaration of taking and for a greater period if the court should so direct. 1960 Op. Att’y Gen., No. 15, issued prior to the 1976 amendment, which added the language beginning “or until after the hearing” to the end of the second sentence of subsection (a).

Sec. 09.55.460.
Effect of appeal.

An appeal or a bond or undertaking given does not operate to prevent or delay the vesting of title to real property or the right to possession of it.

The plaintiff may not be divested of a title or possession acquired except where the court finds that the property was not taken by necessity for a public use or purpose in a manner compatible with the greatest public good and the least private injury. In the event of that finding, the court shall enter the judgment necessary to (1) compensate the persons entitled to it for the period during which the property was in the possession of the plaintiff, (2) recover for the plaintiff any award paid to any person, and (3) order the plaintiff to restore the property to the condition in which it existed at the time of the filing of the declaration of taking unless such restoration is impossible, in which case the court shall award damages to the proper persons as compensation for any diminution in the value of the property caused by the plaintiff’s wrongful possession.

History.

(§ 13.23 ch 101 SLA 1962; am § 3 ch 149 SLA 1976)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1994, in (a) of this section, “An appeal or a bond or undertaking given does not operate” was substituted for “No appeal or a bond or undertaking given operates” to conform the section to the current style of the Alaska Statutes.

Legislative history reports. —

For report on ch. 149, SLA 1976 (HCSSB 546), see 1976 House Journal, p. 945.